Maryland, session 2025, HB0338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
SUBTITLE 10. COLLECTION AND DISPOSAL OF YARD WASTE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0338*

HOUSE BILL 338
2–1001.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “NATURAL WOOD WASTE RECYCLING FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9–1701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(C) “ORGANICS RECYCLING FACILITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9–1701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(D) (1) “STATE BUILDING” MEANS A BUILDING, A STRUCTURE, OR AN
IMPROVED AREA THAT IS:
(I) OWNED BY THE STATE; OR
(II) CONSTRUCTED FOR LEASE BY THE STATE.
(2) “STATE BUILDING” INCLUDES:
(I) AN EDUCATIONAL FACILITY OWNED OR OPERATED BY THE
STATE, INCLUDING PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(II) A PUBLIC MASS TRANSPORTATION ACCOMMODATION, SUCH
AS A TERMINAL OR STATION, THAT IS SUPPORTED BY STATE FUNDS; AND
(III) AN IMPROVEMENT OF A PUBLIC AREA USED FOR
GATHERING OR AMUSEMENT, INCLUDING A STATE PARK, RECREATION CENTER, OR
SIMILAR AREA.
(E) (1) “STATE HIGHWAY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–101 OF THE
TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(2) “STATE HIGHWAY” INCLUDES ANY LAND OWNED BY THE STATE
THAT IS ADJACENT TO A STATE HIGHWAY.
(F) (1) “YARD WASTE” MEANS ORGANIC PLANT WASTE DERIVED FROM
GARDENING, LANDSCAPING, AND TREE TRIMMING ACTIVITIES.
(2) “YARD WASTE” INCLUDES LEAVES, GARDEN WASTE, LAWN
CUTTINGS, WEEDS, AND PRUNINGS.
2–1002.

HOUSE BILL 338 3
(A) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A PERSON WHO:
(I) IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE STATE WHO COLLECTS YARD
WASTE ON THE GROUNDS OF A STATE BUILDING OR STATE HIGHWAY AS PART OF
THAT PERSON’S EMPLOYMENT; OR
(II) CONTRACTS WITH THE STATE TO PROVIDE SERVICES ON
THE GROUNDS OF A STATE BUILDING OR STATE HIGHWAY, INCLUDING THE
COLLECTION OF YARD WASTE.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A PERSON WHO IS DISPOSING
OF:
(I) NOXIOUS WEEDS, AS DESIGNATED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE; OR
(II) INVASIVE SPECIES.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT DISPOSE OF YARD WASTE COLLECTED ON THE
GROUNDS OF A STATE BUILDING OR STATE HIGHWAY IN A SINGLE–USE PLASTIC
CONTAINER.
(C) A PERSON SHALL COLLECT YARD WASTE ON THE GROUNDS OF A STATE
BUILDING OR STATE HIGHWAY IN A CONTAINER THAT:
(1) WILL NOT BE DISCARDED WITH THE YARD WASTE; OR
(2) IS A COMPOSTABLE PAPER BAG.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY IF A PERSON COLLECTS YARD
WASTE AT A LOCATION THAT IS WITHIN A 30–MILE RADIUS OF A FACILITY THAT:
(I) IS IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION; AND
(II) 1. HAS THE CAPACITY TO ACCEPT ALL OF THE PERSON’S
YARD WASTE; AND
2. IS WILLING TO ACCEPT ALL OF THE PERSON’S YARD
WASTE.
(2) ALL YARD WASTE COLLECTED ON THE GROUNDS OF A STATE
BUILDING OR STATE HIGHWAY SHALL BE DISPOSED OF AT:

HOUSE BILL 338
(1) (I) AN ORGANICS RECYCLING FACILITY LOCATED IN THE
STATE;
(2) (II) A NATURAL WOOD WASTE RECYCLING FACILITY LOCATED IN
THE STATE; OR
(3) (III) A STATE FACILITY WITH THE ON–SITE CAPACITY TO CREATE
MULCH OR SOIL AMENDMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.